zh-TW: 重音口琴調音系統: 折衷調音; 十二平均律; 純律; 獨奏調音; 其他
fi: Oktaavihuuliharpun viritysjärjestelmä: Kompromissiviritys; Tasavireinen; Puhdas vire; Sooloviritys; Muu
pl: System strojenia harmonijki oktawowej: Strój kompromisowy; System równomiernie temperowany; Intonacja czysta; Strój solowy; Inny
ru: Система настройки октавной гармоники: Компромиссный строй; Равномерно темперированный строй; Чистый строй; Сольный строй; Другое
tr: Oktav mızıkası akort sistemi: Karma akort; Eşit tamperaman; Saf akort; Solo akort; Diğer
sv: Oktavstämningssystem för munspel: Kompromiss-stämning; Liksvävande stämning; Ren stämning; Solostämning; Övrigt
bg-BG: Система за настройка на октавната хармоника: Компромисна настройка; Равномерна темперация; Чиста интонация; Солова настройка; Друго
pt-BR: Sistema de afinação da gaita de oitavas: Afinação de compromisso; Temperamento igual; Entonação justa; Afinação solo; Outro
es: Sistema de afinación de la armónica de octavas: Afinación de compromiso; Temperamento igual; Entonación justa; Afinación de solo; Otro
pt-PT: Sistema de afinação da harmónica de oitava: Afinação de compromisso; Temperamento igual; Entoação justa; Afinação a solo; Outro
en: Octave harmonica tuning system: Compromise tuning; Equal temperament; Just intonation; Solo tuning; Other
ro-RO: Sistem de acordaj pentru muzicuța octavă: Acordaj de compromis; Temperament egal; Intonație pură; Acordaj solo; Altele
ko: 옥타브 하모니카 튜닝 시스템: 절충 조율; 평균율; 순정률; 솔로 튜닝; 기타
ja: オクターブハーモニカチューニングシステム: コンプロマイズチューニング; 平均律; 純正律; ソロチューニング; その他
th: ระบบปรับเสียงฮาร์โมนิกาอ็อกเทฟ: การจูนเสียงแบบคอมโพรไมซ์; การจูนเสียงแบบเท่าเทียมกัน (Equal Temperament); การจูนเสียงแบบจัสต์อินโทเนชัน (Just Intonation); การจูนเสียงแบบโซโล (Solo Tuning); อื่นๆ
de: Stimmsystem für Oktavenmundharmonika: Kompromissstimmung; Gleichstufige Stimmung; Reine Stimmung; Solostimmung; Andere
sl-SI: Sistem uglaševanja oktavne ustne harmonike: Kompromisna uglasitev; Enakomerna uglasitev; Čista uglasitev; Solo uglasitev; Drugo
hu: Oktáv harmonika hangolórendszer: Kompromisszumos hangolás; Kiegyenlített hangolás; Tiszta hangolás; Szóló hangolás; Egyéb
da: Stemmesystem til oktavstemt mundharmonika: Kompromisstemning; Ligesvævende temperatur; Ren stemning; Solostemning; Andet
cs: Ladicí systém pro oktávovou harmoniku: Kompromisní ladění; Rovnoměrně temperované ladění; Čisté ladění; Sólové ladění; Ostatní
sk-SK: Systém ladenia oktávovej harmoniky: Kompromisné ladenie; Rovnomerne temperované ladenie; Prirodzené ladenie; Sólové ladenie; Iné
fr: Système d'accordage de l'harmonica à octave: Accordage de compromis; Tempérament égal; Intonation juste; Accordage solo; Autre
vi: Hệ thống chỉnh âm của kèn harmonica Octave: Lên dây thỏa hiệp; Lên dây bình quân; Lên dây tự nhiên; Lên dây solo; Khác
lt-LT: Oktavinės lūpinės armonikėlės derinimo sistema: Kompromisinis derinimas; Lygioji temperacija; Grynoji intonacija; Solo derinimas; Kita
zh-CN: 八度口琴调音系统: 折衷调音; 十二平均律; 纯律; 独奏调音; 其他
nb: Stemmesystem for oktavt munnspill: Kompromiss-stemming; Likesvevende stemming; Ren stemming; Solostemming; Annet
el: Σύστημα κουρδίσματος φυσαρμόνικας οκτάβας: Κούρδισμα συμβιβασμού; Συγκερασμένο σύστημα; Φυσικό κούρδισμα; Σόλο κούρδισμα; Άλλο
nl: Stemsysteem octaafharmonica: Compromisstemming; Gelijkzwevende stemming; Reine stemming; Solostemming; Overig
hr-HR: Sustav ugađanja oktavne harmonike: Kompromisno ugađanje; Jednako temperirano ugađanje; Čista intonacija; Solo ugađanje; Ostalo
it: Sistema di accordatura dell'armonica a ottave: Accordatura di compromesso; Temperamento equabile; Intonazione naturale; Accordatura solista; Altro